Hawaii statutes.
§431:9A-106 Application for license. (a)
A person applying for an insurance producer license shall make application to
the commissioner on the uniform application and declare under penalty of
denial, suspension, or revocation of the license that the statements made in
the application are true, accurate, and complete to the best of the applicant's
knowledge and belief. Before approving the application, the commissioner shall
find that the applicant:

(1) Is at least eighteen years of age;

(2) Has not committed any act that is a ground for a
licensure sanction set forth in section 431:9A-112;

(3) Has paid the applicable fees set forth in section
431:7-101;

(4) Has passed, within the two years immediately
preceding the date of the examination or issuance of the license, whichever is
later, the applicable examination for each line of authority for which the
applicant has applied; and

(5) Has submitted a full set of fingerprints,
including a scanned file from a hard copy fingerprint, for the commissioner to
obtain and receive national and state criminal history [record] checks from the
Federal Bureau of Investigation and the Hawaii criminal justice data center,
pursuant to section 846-2.7.

(b) A business entity acting as an insurance
producer is required to obtain an insurance producer license. Application
shall be made using the uniform business entity application. Before approving
the application, the commissioner shall find that:

(1) The business entity has paid all applicable fees;

(2) The business entity has designated a licensed
producer who is a natural person responsible for the business entity's
compliance with the insurance laws and rules of this State; and

(3) Any licensed producer so designated or empowered
by a corporation or partnership may not be so designated or empowered by more
than one corporation or partnership, except when the corporations or
partnerships are affiliates of each other.

As used herein:

"Control" has the same meaning as in
section 431:11-102.

"Corporation or partnership" includes
an affiliate of another corporation or partnership, if the same person,
directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls both
corporations or partnerships.

(c) The commissioner may require any documents
reasonably necessary to verify the information contained in an application. [L
2001, c 216, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 155, §30; am L 2003, c 212, §59; am L 2006,
c 154, §25; am L 2009, c 77, §17]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next